Utah statutes.
63E-1-301.   Definitions.
As used in this part, "government requestor" means:
(1)  the governor;
(2)  an executive branch officer other than the governor;
(3)  an executive branch agency;
(4)  a legislator, including a legislative sponsor of legislation creating an
independent entity; or
(5)  a legislative committee.
